Utah statutes.
59-7-109.   Charitable contributions.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a subtraction is allowed for charitable contributions  made within the taxable year to organizations described in Section 170(c), Internal Revenue Code.

(2)  The aggregate amount of charitable contributions deductible under this section may not exceed 10% of the taxpayer's apportionable income. The limitation imposed in this subsection shall be calculated on a combined basis in a combined report.

(3)  Any charitable contribution made in a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1994, which is in excess of the amount allowed as a deduction under Subsection (2) may be carried over to the five succeeding taxable years in the same manner as allowed under federal law.

